Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2026YH (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 425 Section 1. MEDICAID ââ REIMBURSEMENT FOR THE REPAIR OF 1 COMPLEX REHABILITATION TECHNOLOGY. Under both Medicaid 2 managed care and fee-for-service administration of the 3 Medicaid program, the department of health and human services 4 shall not require a prescription or prior authorization 5 for reimbursement of a provider for the repair of complex 6 rehabilitation equipment, if the complex rehabilitation 7 technology was previously prescribed and reimbursed under 8 the Medicaid program. For the purposes of this section, 9 âcomplex rehabilitation technologyâ means items classified 10 under the Medicare program as durable medical equipment that 11 is individually configured for individuals to meet their 12 specific and unique medical, physical, and functional needs 13 and capacities for basic activities of daily living and 14 instrumental activities of daily living identified as medically 15 necessary. 16